Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 725	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 725	àixer	aixeria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 725	àixer	aixeries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 725	àixer	aixeríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 725	àixer	aixeríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 725	àixer	aixerien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 726	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 726	àixer	aixquí	.		#perfecte
SFX 726	àixer	aixqueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 726	àixer	aixqué	.		#perfecte
SFX 726	àixer	aixquérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 726	àixer	aixquéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 726	àixer	aixqueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 727	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 727	àixer	aixia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 727	àixer	aixies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 727	àixer	aixíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 727	àixer	aixíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 727	àixer	aixien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 728	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 728	éncer	enceria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 728	éncer	enceries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 728	éncer	enceríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 728	éncer	enceríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 728	éncer	encerien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 729	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 729	éncer	enceré	.		#futur
SFX 729	éncer	enceràs	.		#futur
SFX 729	éncer	encerà	.		#futur
SFX 729	éncer	encerem	.		#futur
SFX 729	éncer	encereu	.		#futur
SFX 729	éncer	enceran	.		#futur

SFX 730	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 730	éncer	encera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 730	éncer	enceres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 730	éncer	encérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 730	éncer	encéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 730	éncer	enceren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 731	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 731	éncer	encia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 731	éncer	encies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 731	éncer	encíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 731	éncer	encíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 731	éncer	encien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 732	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 732	éncer	ença/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 732	éncer	ences/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 732	éncer	ençam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 732	éncer	ençau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 732	éncer	encen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 733	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 733	éncer	encí	.		#perfecte
SFX 733	éncer	enceres	.		#perfecte
SFX 733	éncer	encé	.		#perfecte
SFX 733	éncer	encérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 733	éncer	encéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 733	éncer	enceren	.		#perfecte

SFX 734	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 734	éncer	éncer/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 734	éncer	enç/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 734	éncer	ença/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 734	éncer	ençam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 734	éncer	ençau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 734	éncer	encen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 735	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 735	éncer	enç/453	.		#present
SFX 735	éncer	ences/453	.		#present
SFX 735	éncer	encem/453	.		#present
SFX 735	éncer	enceu/453	.		#present
SFX 735	éncer	encen/453	.		#present

SFX 736	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 736	òure	oguera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 736	òure	ogueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 736	òure	oguérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 736	òure	oguéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 736	òure	ogueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 737	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 737	òure	òure/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 737	òure	ou/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 737	òure	oga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 737	òure	ogam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 737	òure	ogau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 737	òure	oguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 738	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 738	òure	oc/453	.		#present
SFX 738	òure	ous/453	.		#present
SFX 738	òure	ou/453	.		#present
SFX 738	òure	oem/453	.		#present
SFX 738	òure	oeu/453	.		#present
SFX 738	òure	ouen/453	.		#present

SFX 739	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 739	òure	ouria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 739	òure	ouries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 739	òure	ouríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 739	òure	ouríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 739	òure	ourien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 740	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 740	òure	ouré	.		#futur
SFX 740	òure	ouràs	.		#futur
SFX 740	òure	ourà	.		#futur
SFX 740	òure	ourem	.		#futur
SFX 740	òure	oureu	.		#futur
SFX 740	òure	ouran	.		#futur

SFX 741	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 741	òure	oguí	.		#perfecte
SFX 741	òure	ogueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 741	òure	ogué	.		#perfecte
SFX 741	òure	oguérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 741	òure	oguéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 741	òure	ogueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 742	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 742	òure	oïa	.		#imperfecte
SFX 742	òure	oïes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 742	òure	oíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 742	òure	oíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 742	òure	oïen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 743	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 743	òure	oga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 743	òure	ogues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 743	òure	ogam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 743	òure	ogau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 743	òure	oguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 744	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 744	aber	é/453	.		#present
SFX 744	aber	aps/453	.		#present
SFX 744	aber	ap/453	.		#present
SFX 744	aber	abem/453	.		#present
SFX 744	aber	abeu/453	.		#present
SFX 744	aber	aben/453	.		#present

SFX 745	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 745	aber	àpia/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 745	aber	àpies/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 745	aber	apiam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 745	aber	apiau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 745	aber	àpien/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 746	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 746	aber	aber/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 746	aber	àpies/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 746	aber	àpia/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 746	aber	apiam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 746	aber	apiau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 746	aber	àpien/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 747	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 747	ar	e/453	.		#present
SFX 747	ar	es/453	.		#present
SFX 747	ar	em/453	.		#present
SFX 747	ar	eu/453	.		#present
SFX 747	ar	en/453	.		#present

SFX 748	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 748	car	quí	.		#perfecte
SFX 748	car	càres	.		#perfecte
SFX 748	car	cà	.		#perfecte
SFX 748	car	càrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 748	car	càreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 748	car	caren	.		#perfecte

SFX 749	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 749	enir	inga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 749	enir	ingues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 749	enir	ingam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 749	enir	ingau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 749	enir	inguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 750	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 750	enir	indré	.		#futur
SFX 750	enir	indràs	.		#futur
SFX 750	enir	indrà	.		#futur
SFX 750	enir	indrem	.		#futur
SFX 750	enir	indreu	.		#futur
SFX 750	enir	indran	.		#futur

SFX 751	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 751	enir	inguí	.		#perfecte
SFX 751	enir	ingueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 751	enir	ingué	.		#perfecte
SFX 751	enir	inguérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 751	enir	inguéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 751	enir	ingueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 752	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 752	enir	indria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 752	enir	indries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 752	enir	indríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 752	enir	indríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 752	enir	indrien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 753	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 753	enir	inguera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 753	enir	ingueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 753	enir	inguérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 753	enir	inguéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 753	enir	ingueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 754	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 754	er	í	.		#perfecte
SFX 754	er	eres	.		#perfecte
SFX 754	er	é	.		#perfecte
SFX 754	er	érem	.		#perfecte
SFX 754	er	éreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 754	er	eren	.		#perfecte
