Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
acaparrar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
acristianar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
aforar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
alarmar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
amelar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
aparaular/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
archivar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
assaltar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
atrofiar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
besar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
camuflar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
cercolar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
colegiar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
conformar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
contraprovar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
convéncer/728,729,730,731,732,733,734,735,1087
còure/736,737,738,739,740,741,742,743,848,1100
custodiar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
depilar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desamoïnar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
descabar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
descossar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desencaminar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desensenyar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desgovernar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desmorrellar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desponcellar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
desvedar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
disseccionar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
emancipar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
emmostar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
emprenyar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
encavallonar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
endevinar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
enfrascar/451,455,456,457,458,473,474,475,748,828,1054
engomar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
enllocar/451,455,456,457,458,473,474,475,748,828,1054
enrunar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
entreverar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
escapar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
esmarrar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
estampar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
exclamar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
fallar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
formar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
gestionar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
horripilar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
incorporar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
inspirar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
juramentar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
localisar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
matacanar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
modernisar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
nàixer/720,721,722,723,724,725,726,727,1097
nivellar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
orlar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
pensionar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
privatisar/451,455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
recaptar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
relativisar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
renàixer/720,721,722,723,724,725,726,727,1096
revirar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
ròure/736,737,738,739,740,741,742,743,1101
sobrenadar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
tenir/467,749,750,751,752,753,914,916,1090
timbrar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
véncer/728,729,730,731,732,733,734,735,1087
venir/467,749,750,751,752,753,915,917,1090
vexar/455,456,457,458,459,460,461,462,747,828,878,1054
